Mississippi, session 2026, HB1651.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 27-104-203, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-104-203.  (1) From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent, audit fee, personnel fee or other charge for services or resources received.  The provisions of this section shall not apply (a) to grants, contracts, pass-through funds, project fees or other charges for services between state agencies and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, any public university, the Mississippi Community College Board, any public community or junior college, and the State Department of Education, nor (b) to charges for services between the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, any public university, the Mississippi Community College Board, any public community or junior college, and the State Department of Education, nor (c) to federal grants, pass-through funds, cost allocation charges, surplus property charges or project fees between state agencies as approved or determined by the State Fiscal Officer, nor (d) telecommunications, data center services, and/or other information technology services that are used on an as-needed basis and those costs shall be passed through to the using agency, nor (e) to federal grants, special funds, or pass-through funds, available for payment by state agencies to the Department of Finance and Administration related to Mississippi Management and Reporting Systems (MMRS) Statewide Application charges and utilities as approved or determined by the State Fiscal Officer, nor (f) to grants, contracts, pass-through funds, project fees or charges for services between the State Department of Health and the State Department of Revenue, and other state agencies or entities, including, but not limited to, the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, any public university, the Mississippi Community College Board, any public community or junior college, and the State Department of Education, for the operation of the medical cannabis program as established by the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act, nor (g) to charges between the Department of Human Services and the Department of Child Protection Services for services or resources received by either department from the other.  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, any public university, the Mississippi Community College Board, any public community or junior college, and the State Department of Education shall retain the authority to charge and be charged for expenditures that they deemed nonrecurring in nature by the State Fiscal Officer. (3)  Consistent with the prohibition on interagency fees in subsection (1) of this section, no state agency shall expend funds for personal or professional services from a private source without first certifying that such services are unavailable through an interagency agreement with another state agency at no cost to the procuring agency.  The Department of Finance and Administration shall maintain a "shared services inventory" listing all professional capabilities available within state government for this purpose. SECTION 2. There is created the Shared Human Resources Program within the Mississippi State Personnel Board.  The board shall serve as the human resources department for any state agency with an appropriated headcount of fewer than thirty (30). SECTION 3. The Department of Finance and Administration shall serve as the accounting and procurement department for any state agency with an appropriated headcount of fewer than thirty (30). SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.